California statutes. Labor Code
(3) Additional training shall be provided when a new or previously unrecognized workplace violence hazard has been identified and when changes are made to the plan. The additional training may be limited to addressing the new workplace violence hazard or changes to the plan.

(f) (1) Records of workplace violence hazard identification, evaluation, and correction shall be created and maintained for a minimum of five years.

(2) Training records shall be created and maintained for a minimum of one year and include training dates, contents or a summary of the training sessions, names and qualifications of persons conducting the training, and names and job titles of all persons attending the training sessions.

(3) Violent incident logs required by subdivision (d) shall be maintained for a minimum of five years.

(4) Records of workplace violence incident investigations conducted pursuant to subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall be maintained for a minimum of five years. These records shall not contain “medical information,” as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 56.05 of the Civil Code.

(5) All records required by this subdivision shall be made available to
 the division upon request for examination and copying.

(6) All records required by paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, shall be made available to employees and their representatives, upon request and without cost, for examination and copying within 15 calendar days of a request.

(g) The division shall enforce this section by the issuance of a citation alleging a violation of this section and a notice of civil penalty in a manner consistent with Section 6317. Any person who receives a citation and penalty may appeal the citation and penalty to the appeals board in a manner consistent with Section 6319.

(h) The division shall propose, no later than December 31, 2025, and the standards board shall adopt, no later than December 31, 2026, standards regarding the plan required by this section. The standards shall include, at
 a minimum, the requirements of this section and any additional requirements the division deems necessary and appropriate to protect the health and safety of employees.

(i) Subdivisions (b) to (g), inclusive, shall be operative on and after July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 289, Sec. 4.   (SB 553)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.

No employer shall require, or permit any employee to go or be in any employment or place of employment which is not safe and healthful.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

No employer shall fail or neglect to do any of the following:

(a) To provide and use safety devices and safeguards reasonably adequate to render the employment and place of employment safe.

(b) To adopt and use methods and processes reasonably adequate to render the employment and place of employment safe.

(c) To do every other thing reasonably necessary to protect the life, safety, and health of employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.1.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds that having access to a health care employer-level inventory of personal protective equipment in the event of a pandemic or other health emergency is vital to the health and safety of its health care workforce, as well as the general population, who both rely on the state’s health care workforce for care and are susceptible to disease transmission should members of the health care workforce needlessly be infected with transmissible disease.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Department” means the Department of Industrial Relations.

(2) (A) “Health care employer” means a person or organization that employs workers in the public or private sector to provide direct patient care in a general acute care hospital setting as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, a health facility as defined in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, a medical practice that is operated or maintained as part of an integrated health system or health facility, or a dialysis clinic licensed in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) “Health care employer” does not include an independent medical practice that is owned and operated, or maintained as a clinic or office, by one or more licensed physicians and used as an office for the practice of
 their profession, within the scope of their license, regardless of the name used publicly to identify the place or establishment unless the medical practice is operated or maintained exclusively as part of an integrated health system or health facility or is an entity described in subdivision (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “PPE” and “health care worker” have the same meanings as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 131021 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (h), a health care employer shall maintain an inventory of unexpired PPE, as specified in this section, for use in the event of a state of emergency declaration by the Governor, or a local emergency for a pandemic or other health emergency.
 Personal protective equipment in the inventory shall be new and not previously worn or used. A health care employer who violates the requirement to maintain an inventory of unexpired personal protective equipment prescribed by this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation, as specified in Section 6428.

(d) (1) Commencing January 1, 2023, or 365 days after regulations are adopted pursuant to subdivision (h), whichever is later, health care employers shall have an inventory at least sufficient for 45 days of surge consumption, as determined by those regulations. The regulations shall not establish policies or standards that are less protective or prescriptive than any federal, state, or local law on PPE standards.

(2) A health care employer shall provide an inventory of its PPE to the Division of Occupational Safety and Health upon request. An employer who violates this requirement shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation. This subdivision does not apply to a health care employer that provides services in a facility or other setting controlled or owned by another health care employer that is obligated to maintain a PPE inventory and report that inventory pursuant to this subdivision for all its owned or controlled facilities and settings.

(e) (1) If a health care employer provides services in a facility or other setting controlled or owned by another health care employer who is obligated to maintain a PPE
 inventory, the health care employer who controls or owns the facility or other setting shall be required to maintain the required PPE for the health care employer providing services in that facility or setting.

(2) A health care employer may apply for a waiver of some or all of the PPE inventory requirements of subdivision (d) by writing to the department, which may approve the waiver if the facility has 25 or fewer employees and the employer agrees to close in-person operations during a public health emergency in which increased use of PPE is recommended by the public health officer until sufficient PPE becomes available to return to in-person operations. This provision does not apply to health facilities as described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) If a health care employer’s inventory of a type of PPE dips below the mandated level of supplies as a result of the health care employer’s distribution of that type of PPE to its health care workers or another health care employer’s workers during a state of emergency declared by the Governor or a declared local emergency for a pandemic or other health emergency, the health care employer shall not be subject to the civil penalty established by subdivision (c) for 30 days, provided the health care employer replenishes its inventory to the mandated level within 30 days if the department has determined there is not a supply limitation.

(f) The department may exempt a health care employer from a civil penalty prescribed by subdivision (c) if the department determines that supply chain limitations make meeting the mandated level
 of supplies infeasible and a health care employer has made a reasonable attempt, in the discretion of the department, to obtain PPE, or if the health care employer makes a showing that meeting the mandated level of supplies is not possible due to issues beyond their control, such as if the equipment was ordered from a manufacturer or distributor but the order was not fulfilled, or if the equipment was damaged or stolen.

(g) Consistent with existing law, a designated health care employer shall supply appropriate PPE to its health care workers, ensure that its health care workers use the PPE supplied to them, and provide appropriate PPE to its health care workers upon their request. This paragraph is declaratory of existing law.

(h) The department, by regulation and in consultation
 with the State Department of Public Health, shall set forth requirements for determining 45-day surge capacity levels for health care employer inventory as required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), including, but not limited to, the types and amount of PPE to be maintained by the health care employer based on the type and size of each health care employer, as well as the composition of health care workers in its workforce. The regulations shall require each health care employer to maintain sufficient PPE for all health care workers. The regulations shall consider the recommendations of the Personal Protective Equipment Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 131021 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 122.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.3.

(a) For purposes of this section: 

(1) “Employer” means a person or organization that employs workers in the public or private sector to provide direct patient care in a general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Personal protective equipment” means the equipment and devices necessary to comply with Sections 3380 and 5199 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, provided that those requirements
 are at least as protective as those sections read on May 4, 2020.

(b) An employer shall supply personal protective equipment to employees who provide direct patient care or provide services that directly support patient care in a general acute care hospital. An employer shall ensure that employees use the personal protective equipment supplied to them. 

(c) (1) Beginning April 1,
 2021, an employer shall maintain a stockpile of the following equipment in the amount equal to three months of normal consumption:

(A) N95 filtering facepiece respirators.

(B) Powered air-purifying respirators with high efficiency particulate air filters.

(C) Elastomeric air-purifying respirators and appropriate particulate filters or cartridges.

(D) Surgical masks.

(E) Isolation gowns.

(F) Eye protection.

(G) Shoe coverings.

(2) Single use equipment
 in the stockpile shall be unexpired, new, and not previously worn or used. An employer shall provide an inventory of its stockpile and a copy of its written procedures required pursuant to subdivision (f) to the Division of Occupational Safety and Health upon request. An employer who violates the requirement to maintain a supply of equipment prescribed by this subdivision shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each
 violation, unless the department determines that the employer could not meet the requirement due to issues beyond their control, such as the employer can demonstrate that equipment needed to meet the requirements of this section has been ordered from their manufacturer or distributor and not fulfilled, or has been damaged or stolen. The exemption from a civil penalty shall apply only to the type of equipment listed in paragraph (1) that is affected by issues beyond the employer's control. An employer shall still maintain the equipment that is not affected by issues beyond the employer's control.

(d) If an employer provides health care services in a facility or other setting controlled by another employer who is obligated to maintain a stockpile pursuant to subdivision (c), the employer who
 controls the facility or other setting shall maintain the required equipment for the employer providing health care services in that facility or setting.

(e) On or before January 15, 2021, an employer licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code shall be prepared to report to the department, under penalty of perjury, its highest seven-day consecutive daily average consumption of personal protective equipment during the 2019 calendar
 year, upon request by the department. General acute care hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals are exempt from this requirement. State hospitals shall make their highest seven-day consecutive daily average consumption of personal protective equipment during the 2019 calendar year available upon request to the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(f) An employer shall establish and implement effective written procedures for periodically determining the quantity and types of equipment used in its normal consumption.

(g) The division may enforce an alleged violation of this section through the issuance of a citation, pursuant to Section 6317.

(h) Subdivision (b) is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 2537)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.5.

(a) As part of the injury and illness prevention programs required by Section 3203 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, or any successor law or regulation, employers shall adopt a patient protection and health care worker back and musculoskeletal injury prevention plan. The plan shall include a safe patient handling policy component reflected in professional occupational safety guidelines for the protection of patients and health care workers in health
 care facilities. 

(b) An employer shall maintain a safe patient handling policy at all times for all patient care units, and shall provide trained lift teams or other support staff trained in safe lifting techniques in each general acute care hospital. The employer shall provide training to health care workers that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

 (1) The appropriate use of lifting devices and equipment.

(2) The five areas of body exposure: vertical, lateral, bariatric, repositioning, and ambulation.

 (3) The use of lifting devices to handle patients safely.

(c) As the coordinator of care, the registered nurse shall be responsible for the observation and direction of
 patient lifts and mobilization, and shall participate as needed in patient handling in accordance with the nurse’s job description and professional judgment.

(d) For purposes of this section, “lift team” means hospital employees specifically trained to handle patient lifts, repositionings, and transfers using patient transfer, repositioning, or lifting devices as appropriate for the specific patient. Lift team members may perform other duties as assigned during their shifts. A general acute care hospital shall not be required by this section to hire new staff to comprise the lift team so long as direct patient care assignments are not compromised.

(e) For purposes of this section, “health care worker” means a lift team member or other staff responsible for assisting in lifting patients who is a hospital employee specifically trained to handle patient lifts, repositioning, and
 transfers using patient transfer, repositioning, and lifting devices as appropriate for the specific patient.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “safe patient handling policy” means a policy that requires replacement of manual lifting and transferring of patients with powered patient transfer devices, lifting devices, and lift teams, as appropriate for the specific patient and consistent with the employer’s safety policies and the professional judgment and clinical assessment of the registered nurse.

(g) A health care worker who refuses to lift, reposition, or transfer a patient due to concerns about patient or worker safety or the lack of trained lift team personnel or equipment shall not, based upon the refusal, be the subject of disciplinary action by the hospital or any of its managers or employees.

(h) This
 section shall not apply to general acute care hospitals within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the State Department of Developmental Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 554, Sec. 3.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

No employer shall occupy or maintain any place of employment that is not safe and healthful.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that regulation of smoking in the workplace is a matter of statewide interest and concern. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to prohibit the smoking of tobacco products in all (100 percent of) enclosed places of employment in this state, as covered by this section, thereby eliminating the need of local governments to enact workplace smoking restrictions within their respective jurisdictions. It is further the intent of the Legislature to create a uniform statewide standard to restrict and prohibit the smoking of tobacco products in enclosed places of employment, as specified in this section, in order to reduce employee exposure to environmental tobacco smoke to a level that will prevent anything other than insignificantly harmful effects to exposed employees, and
 also to eliminate the confusion and hardship that can result from enactment or enforcement of disparate local workplace smoking restrictions. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, it is the intent of the Legislature that an area not defined as a “place of employment” pursuant to subdivision (e) is subject to local regulation of smoking of tobacco products.

(b) For purposes of this section, an “owner-operated business” shall mean a business having no employees, independent contractors, or volunteers, in which the owner-operator of the business is the only worker. “Enclosed space” includes covered parking lots, lobbies, lounges, waiting areas, elevators, stairwells, and restrooms that are a structural part of the building and not specifically defined in subdivision (e).

(c) An employer or owner-operator of an owner-operated business shall not knowingly or
 intentionally permit, and a person shall not engage in, the smoking of tobacco products at a place of employment or in an enclosed space.

(d) For purposes of this section, an employer or owner-operator of an owner-operated business who permits any nonemployee access to their place of employment or owner-operated business on a regular basis has not acted knowingly or intentionally in violation of this section if the employer or owner-operator has taken the following reasonable steps to prevent smoking by a nonemployee:

(1) Posted clear and prominent signs, as follows:

(A) Where smoking is prohibited throughout the building or structure, a sign stating “No smoking” shall be posted at each entrance to the building or structure.

(B) Where smoking is permitted in designated areas of the building or structure, a sign stating “Smoking is prohibited except in designated areas” shall be posted at each entrance to the building or structure.

(2) Has requested, when appropriate, that a nonemployee who is smoking refrain from smoking in the enclosed workplace or owner-operated business.

For purposes of this subdivision, “reasonable steps” does not include (A) the physical ejection of a nonemployee from the place of employment or
 owner-operated business or (B) any requirement for making a request to a nonemployee to refrain from smoking, under circumstances involving a risk of physical harm to the employer or any employee or owner-operator.

(e) For purposes of this section, “place of employment” does not include any of the following:

(1) Retail or wholesale tobacco shops and private smokers’ lounges. For purposes of this paragraph:

(A) “Private smokers’ lounge” means any enclosed area in or attached to a retail or wholesale tobacco shop that is dedicated to the use of tobacco products, including, but not limited to, cigars and pipes.

(B) “Retail or wholesale tobacco shop” means any business establishment, the main purpose of which is the sale of tobacco products, including, but not limited to, cigars, pipe tobacco, and smoking accessories.

(2) Cabs of
 motortrucks, as defined in Section 410 of the Vehicle Code, or truck tractors, as defined in Section 655 of the Vehicle Code, if nonsmoking employees are not present.

(3) Theatrical production sites, if smoking is an integral part of the story in the theatrical production.

(4) Medical research or treatment sites, if smoking is
 integral to the research and treatment being conducted.

(5) Private residences, except for private residences licensed as family day care homes where smoking is prohibited pursuant to Section 1596.795 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) Patient smoking areas in long-term health care facilities, as defined in Section 1418 of the Health
 and Safety Code.

(f) The smoking prohibition set forth in this section constitutes a uniform statewide standard for regulating the smoking of tobacco products in enclosed places of employment and owner-operated businesses and supersedes and renders unnecessary the local enactment or enforcement of local ordinances regulating the smoking of tobacco products in enclosed places of employment and owner-operated businesses. Insofar as the smoking prohibition set forth in this section is applicable to all (100 percent) places of employment and owner-operated businesses within this state and, therefore, provides the maximum degree of coverage, the practical effect of this section is to eliminate the need of local governments to enact enclosed workplace smoking restrictions within their respective jurisdictions.

(g) This section does not prohibit an employer or owner-operator of an
 owner-operated business from prohibiting smoking of tobacco products in an enclosed place of employment or owner-operated business for any reason.

(h) The enactment of local regulation of smoking of tobacco products in enclosed places of employment or owner-operated businesses by local governments shall be suspended only for as long as, and to the extent that, the (100 percent) smoking prohibition provided for in this section remains in effect. In the event this section is repealed or modified by subsequent legislative or judicial action so that the (100 percent) smoking prohibition is no longer applicable to all enclosed places of employment and owner-operated businesses in California, local governments shall have the full right and authority to enforce previously enacted, and to enact and enforce new, restrictions on the smoking of tobacco products in enclosed places of employment and owner-operated businesses within their jurisdictions,
 including a complete prohibition of smoking. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an area not defined as a “place of employment” or in which smoking is not regulated pursuant to subdivision (e), is subject to local regulation of smoking of tobacco products.

(i) A violation of the prohibition set forth in subdivision (c) is an infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for a first violation, two hundred dollars ($200) for a second violation within one year, and five hundred dollars ($500) for a third and for each subsequent violation within one year. This subdivision shall be enforced by local law enforcement agencies, including, but not limited to, local health departments, as determined by the local governing body.

(j) Notwithstanding Section 6309, the division is not required to respond to any complaint regarding the smoking of
 tobacco products in an enclosed space at a place of employment, unless the employer has been found guilty pursuant to subdivision (i) of a third violation of subdivision (c) within the previous year.

(k) If a provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(l) For purposes of this section, “smoking” has the same meaning as in subdivision (c) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(m) For purposes of this section, “tobacco product” means a product or device as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 182, Sec. 3.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6405.

No employer, owner, or lessee of any real property shall construct or cause to be constructed any place of employment that is not safe and healthful.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6406.

No person shall do any of the following:

(a) Remove, displace, damage, destroy or carry off any safety device, safeguard, notice, or warning, furnished for use in any employment or place of employment.

(b) Interfere in any way with the use thereof by any other person.

(c) Interfere with the use of any method or process adopted for the protection of any employee, including himself, in such employment, or place of employment. 

(d) Fail or neglect to do every other thing reasonably necessary to protect the life, safety, and health of employees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6407.

Every employer and every employee shall comply with occupational safety and health standards, with Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, and with all rules, regulations, and orders pursuant to this division which are applicable to his own actions and conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

6408.

All employers shall provide information to employees in the following ways, as prescribed by authorized regulations:

(a) Posting of information regarding protections and obligations of employees under occupational safety and health laws.

(b) Posting prominently each citation issued under Section 6317, or a copy or copies thereof, at or near each place a violation referred to in the notice of violation occurred.

(c) The opportunity for employees or their representatives to observe
 monitoring or measuring of employee exposure to hazards conducted pursuant to standards promulgated under Section 142.3.

(d) Allow access by employees or their representatives to accurate records of employee exposures to potentially toxic materials or harmful physical agents.

(e) Notification of any employee who has been or is being exposed to toxic materials or harmful physical agents in concentrations or at levels exceeding those prescribed by an applicable standard, order, or special order, and informing any employee so exposed of corrective action being taken.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6409.

(a) Every physician as defined in Section 3209.3 who attends any injured employee shall file a complete report of that occupational injury or occupational illness in a manner prescribed by the administrative director of the Division of Workers’ Compensation. The report shall include a diagnosis, the injured employee’s description of how the injury or illness occurred, any treatment rendered at the time of the examination, any work restrictions resulting from the injury or illness, a treatment plan, and other content as prescribed by the administrative director. The form shall be filed electronically with the Division of Workers’ Compensation and the employer, or if insured, with the employer’s insurer, within five days of the initial examination. If the treatment is for pesticide poisoning or a condition suspected to be pesticide
 poisoning, the physician shall also, within 24 hours of the initial examination, file a complete report with the local health officer by facsimile transmission or other means. If the treatment is for pesticide poisoning or a condition suspected to be pesticide poisoning, the physician shall not be compensated for the initial diagnosis and treatment unless the report is filed with the Division of Workers’ Compensation, the employer, or if insured, with the employer’s insurer, and includes or is accompanied by a signed affidavit which certifies that a copy of the report was filed with the local health officer pursuant to this section.

(b) As used in this section, “occupational illness” means any abnormal condition or disorder caused by exposure to environmental factors associated with employment, including acute and chronic illnesses or diseases which may be caused by inhalation, absorption, ingestion, or direct
 contact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 868, Sec. 13.   (SB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6409.1.

(a) Every employer shall file a complete report of every occupational injury or occupational illness, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6409, of each employee which results in lost time beyond the date of the injury or illness, or which requires medical treatment beyond first aid, with the Department of Industrial Relations or, if an insured employer, with the insurer, on a form prescribed for that purpose by the department. A report shall be filed concerning each injury and illness which has, or is alleged to have, arisen out of and in the course of employment, within five days after the employer obtains knowledge of the injury or illness. Each report of occupational injury or occupational illness shall indicate the social security number of the injured employee. In the case of an insured employer, the insurer shall file
 with the division immediately upon receipt, a copy of the employer’s report, which has been received from the insured employer. In the event an employer has filed a report of injury or illness pursuant to this subdivision and the employee subsequently dies as a result of the reported injury or illness, the employer shall file an amended report indicating the death with the department or, if an insured employer, with the insurer, within five days after the employer is notified or learns of the death. A copy of any amended reports received by the insurer shall be filed with the division immediately upon receipt.

(b) In every case involving a serious injury or illness, or death, in addition to the report required by subdivision (a), a report shall be made immediately by the employer to the Division of Occupational Safety and Health by telephone or through a specified online mechanism established by the division for this purpose.
 Until the division has made such an online mechanism available, the employer shall be permitted to make the report required by this subdivision by telephone or email. An employer who violates this subdivision may be assessed a civil penalty of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000). Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to increase the maximum civil penalty, pursuant to Sections 6427 to 6430, inclusive, that may be imposed for a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 199, Sec. 1.   (AB 1804)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6409.2.

Whenever a state, county, or local fire or police agency is called to an accident involving an employee covered by this part in which a serious injury or illness, or death occurs, the responding agency shall immediately notify the nearest office of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health by telephone. Thereafter, the division shall immediately notify the appropriate prosecuting authority of the accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 885, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6409.3.

In no case shall the treatment administered for pesticide poisoning or a condition suspected as pesticide poisoning be deemed to be first aid treatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 889.)
-------------------------------------------

6409.5.

(a) Whenever any local public fire agency has knowledge that a place of employment where garment manufacturing operations take place contains fire or safety hazards for which fire and injury prevention measures have not been taken in accordance with local fire and life safety ordinances, the agency may notify the Division of Occupational Safety and Health. This referral shall be made only after the garment manufacturing employer has been given a reasonable amount of time to correct violations.

(b) Whenever the Division of Occupational Safety and
 Health has knowledge or reasonable suspicion that a place of employment where garment manufacturing operations take place contains fire or safety hazards for which fire and injury prevention measures have not been taken in accordance with local fire and life safety ordinances, the division shall notify the appropriate local public fire agency. 

(c) Whenever the Division of Occupational Safety and Health receives a referral by a local public fire agency pursuant to subdivision (a) which informs the division that a place of employment where garment manufacturing operations take place is not safe or is injurious to the welfare of any employee, it shall constitute a complaint for purposes of Section 6309 and shall be investigated.

(d) Whenever a local public fire agency receives a referral by the Division of Occupational Safety and Health pursuant to subdivision (b) which informs the
 local public fire agency that a place of employment where garment manufacturing operations take place is not safe or is injurious to the welfare of any employee, the local public fire agency may investigate the referral at its discretion.

(e) (1) If the Division of Occupational Safety and Health acquires knowledge that the garment manufacturing employer is not currently registered, it shall notify the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(2) Local public fire agencies may make referrals of individuals not registered as garment manufacturers to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(3) Whenever the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement is informed by the Division of Occupational Safety and Health or by a local public fire agency that a garment manufacturing employer is unregistered,
 the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall take measures it deems appropriate to obtain compliance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 7, Sec. 2.   Effective December 13, 1990.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

6410.

(a) The reports required by subdivision (a) of Section 6409 and Section 6413 shall be made in the form and detail and within the time limits prescribed by reasonable rules and regulations adopted by the Department of Industrial Relations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Nothing in this chapter requiring recordkeeping and reporting by employers shall relieve the employer of maintaining records and making reports to the assistant secretary, United States Department of Labor, as required under the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (P.L. 91-596). The Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall prescribe and provide the forms necessary for maintenance of the required records, and shall enforce by citation and penalty assessment any violation of the recordkeeping requirements of this chapter.

(c) All state and local government employers shall maintain records and make reports in the same manner and to the same extent as required of other employers by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 111.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6410.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the division maintain strong workplace injury and illness reporting standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 538, Sec. 5.   (AB 2334)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6410.2.

(a) The division shall monitor rulemaking and implementation of the United States Department of Labor’s Occupational Safety and Health Administration’s Improve Tracking of Workplace Injuries and Illnesses rule as published in the federal Register (81 FR 29624) with respect to the electronic submission of workplace injury and illness data.

(b) If the division determines that the Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) has eliminated or substantially diminished the requirement that employers electronically submit OSHA injury and illness data pursuant to 81 FR 29624, the division shall, within 120 days of the determination, convene an advisory committee to evaluate how to implement the changes necessary to protect the goals of the
 Improve Tracking of Workplace Injuries and Illnesses rule, as issued May 12, 2016. The committee shall be composed of parties in both management and labor and include parties that are required to keep injury and illness records under Article 2 (commencing with Section 14300) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations. 

(c) This section does not require the disclosure of information prohibited under Section 6412.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 538, Sec. 6.   (AB 2334)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6410.5.

The reports required by subdivision (a) of Section 6409, subdivision (a) of Section 6409.1, and Section 6413 shall contain, prominently stated, the statement set forth in Section 5401.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 116, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

6411.

Every employer or insurer receiving forms with directions from the Department of Industrial Relations to complete them shall cause them to be properly filled out so as to answer fully and correctly each question propounded therein. In case of inability to answer any questions, a good and sufficient reason shall be given for such failure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 112.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6412.
